browser/locales/l10n/fr/extensions/spellcheck/hunspell/fr.aff
FLAG long
SFX fA Y 38
SFX fA aïr aïr/n'q'd'l'm't's' aïr po:infi
SFX fA aïr aïssant/n'q'd'l'm't's' aïr po:ppre
SFX fA aïr aï/L'D'Q' aïr po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:sg
SFX fA aïr aïs/D'Q' aïr po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:pl
SFX fA aïr aïe/L'D'Q' aïr po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:sg
SFX fA aïr aïes/D'Q' aïr po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:pl
SFX fA aïr ais/j'n'q'l'm't' aïr po:ipre po:1sg po:2sg
SFX fA aïr ait/n'q'l'm't's' aïr po:ipre po:3sg
SFX fA aïr aïssons/n'q'l't' aïr po:ipre po:1pl
SFX fA aïr aïssez/n'q'l'm' aïr po:ipre po:2pl
SFX fA aïr aïssent/n'q'l'm't's' aïr po:ipre po:spre po:simp po:3pl
SFX fA aïr aïssais/j'n'q'l'm't' aïr po:iimp po:1sg po:2sg
SFX fA aïr aïssait/n'q'l'm't's' aïr po:iimp po:3sg
SFX fA aïr aïssions/n'q'l't' aïr po:iimp po:spre po:simp po:1pl
SFX fA aïr aïssiez/n'q'l'm' aïr po:iimp po:spre po:simp po:2pl
SFX fA aïr aïssaient/n'q'l'm't's' aïr po:iimp po:3pl
SFX fA aïr aïs/j'n'q'l'm't' aïr po:ipsi po:1sg po:2sg
SFX fA aïr aït/n'q'l'm't's' aïr po:ipsi po:simp po:3sg
SFX fA aïr aïmes/n'q'l't' aïr po:ipsi po:1pl
SFX fA aïr aïtes/n'q'l'm' aïr po:ipsi po:2pl
SFX fA aïr aïrent/n'q'l'm't's' aïr po:ipsi po:3pl!
SFX fA aïr aïrai/j'n'q'l'm't' aïr po:ifut po:1sg
SFX fA aïr aïras/n'q'l'm't' aïr po:ifut po:2sg
SFX fA aïr aïra/n'q'l'm't's' aïr po:ifut po:3sg
SFX fA aïr aïrons/n'q'l't' aïr po:ifut po:1pl
SFX fA aïr aïrez/n'q'l'm' aïr po:ifut po:2pl
SFX fA aïr aïront/n'q'l'm't's' aïr po:ifut po:3pl!
SFX fA aïr aïrais/j'n'q'l'm't' aïr po:cond po:1sg po:2sg
SFX fA aïr aïrait/n'q'l'm't's' aïr po:cond po:3sg
SFX fA aïr aïrions/n'q'l't' aïr po:cond po:1pl
SFX fA aïr aïriez/n'q'l'm' aïr po:cond po:2pl
SFX fA aïr aïraient/n'q'l'm't's' aïr po:cond po:3pl
SFX fA aïr aïsse/j'n'q'l'm't' aïr po:spre po:simp po:1sg
SFX fA aïr aïsses/n'q'l'm't' aïr po:spre po:simp po:2sg
SFX fA aïr aïsse/n'q'l'm't's' aïr po:spre po:3sg
SFX fA aïr ais/n'l'm't' aïr po:impe po:2sg
SFX fA aïr aïssons/n'l't' aïr po:impe po:1pl
SFX fA aïr aïssez/n'l'm' aïr po:impe po:2pl

SFX fB Y 29
SFX fB haïr haïr/n'q'd'l'm't's' aïr po:infi
SFX fB haïr haïssant/n'q'd'l'm't's' aïr po:ppre
SFX fB haïr haï/q' aïr po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:sg
SFX fB haïr haïs/q' aïr po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:pl
SFX fB haïr haïe/q' aïr po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:sg
SFX fB haïr haïes/q' aïr po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:pl
SFX fB haïr hait/n'q'l'm't's' aïr po:ipre po:3sg
SFX fB haïr haïssons/n'q'l't' aïr po:ipre po:1pl
SFX fB haïr haïssez/n'q'l'm' aïr po:ipre po:2pl
SFX fB haïr haïssent/n'q'l'm't's' aïr po:ipre po:spre po:simp po:3pl
SFX fB haïr haïssait/n'q'l'm't's' aïr po:iimp po:3sg
SFX fB haïr haïssions/n'q'l't' aïr po:iimp po:spre po:simp po:1pl
SFX fB haïr haïssiez/n'q'l'm' aïr po:iimp po:spre po:simp po:2pl
SFX fB haïr haïssaient/n'q'l'm't's' aïr po:iimp po:3pl
SFX fB haïr haït/n'q'l'm't's' aïr po:ipsi po:simp po:3sg
SFX fB haïr haïmes/n'q'l't' aïr po:ipsi po:1pl
SFX fB haïr haïtes/n'q'l'm' aïr po:ipsi po:2pl
SFX fB haïr haïrent/n'q'l'm't's' aïr po:ipsi po:3pl!
SFX fB haïr haïra/n'q'l'm't's' aïr po:ifut po:3sg
SFX fB haïr haïrons/n'q'l't' aïr po:ifut po:1pl
SFX fB haïr haïrez/n'q'l'm' aïr po:ifut po:2pl
SFX fB haïr haïront/n'q'l'm't's' aïr po:ifut po:3pl!
SFX fB haïr haïrait/n'q'l'm't's' aïr po:cond po:3sg
SFX fB haïr haïrions/n'q'l't' aïr po:cond po:1pl
SFX fB haïr haïriez/n'q'l'm' aïr po:cond po:2pl
SFX fB haïr haïraient/n'q'l'm't's' aïr po:cond po:3pl
SFX fB haïr haïsse/n'q'l'm't's' aïr po:spre po:3sg
SFX fB haïr haïssons/n'l't' aïr po:impe po:1pl
SFX fB haïr haïssez/n'l'm' aïr po:impe po:2pl

SFX fC Y 11
SFX fC partir partir/n'q'd'l'm't's' impartir po:infi
SFX fC partir partissant/n'q'd'l'm't's' impartir po:ppre
SFX fC partir parti/L'D'Q' impartir po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:sg
SFX fC partir partis/D'Q' impartir po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:pl
SFX fC partir partie/L'D'Q' impartir po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:sg
SFX fC partir parties/D'Q' impartir po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:pl
SFX fC partir partis/j'n'q'l'm't' impartir po:ipre po:1sg po:2sg
SFX fC partir partit/n'q'l'm't's' impartir po:ipre po:3sg
SFX fC partir partissons/n'q'l't' impartir po:ipre po:1pl
SFX fC partir partissez/n'q'l'm' impartir po:ipre po:2pl
SFX fC partir partissent/n'q'l'm't's' impartir po:ipre po:3pl!

SFX fD Y 12
SFX fD ortir ortir/n'q'd'l'm't's' sortir po:infi
SFX fD ortir ortissant/n'q'd'l'm't's' sortir po:ppre
SFX fD ortir ortit/n'q'l'm't's' sortir po:ipre po:3sg
SFX fD ortir ortissent/n'q'l'm't's' sortir po:ipre po:spre po:simp po:3pl
SFX fD ortir ortissait/n'q'l'm't's' sortir po:iimp po:3sg
SFX fD ortir ortissaient/n'q'l'm't's' sortir po:iimp po:3pl
SFX fD ortir ortira/n'q'l'm't's' sortir po:ifut po:3sg
SFX fD ortir ortiront/n'q'l'm't's' sortir po:ifut po:3pl!
SFX fD ortir ortirait/n'q'l'm't's' sortir po:cond po:3sg
SFX fD ortir ortiraient/n'q'l'm't's' sortir po:cond po:3pl
SFX fD ortir ortisse/n'q'l'm't's' sortir po:spre po:3sg
SFX fD ortir ortît/n'q'l'm't's' sortir po:simp po:3sg

SFX fY Y 37
SFX fY uïr uïr/n'q'd'l'm't's' uïr po:infi
SFX fY uïr uïssant/n'q'd'l'm't's' uïr po:ppre
SFX fY uïr uï/d'q' uïr po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:sg
SFX fY uïr uïs/d'q' uïr po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:pl
SFX fY uïr uïe/d'q' uïr po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:sg
SFX fY uïr uïes/d'q' uïr po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:pl
SFX fY uïr uïs/j'n'q'l'm't' uïr po:ipre po:ipsi po:1sg po:2sg
SFX fY uïr uït/n'q'l'm't's' uïr po:ipre po:ipsi po:3sg
SFX fY uïr uïssons/n'q'l't' uïr po:ipre po:1pl
SFX fY uïr uïssez/n'q'l'm' uïr po:ipre po:2pl
SFX fY uïr uïssent/n'q'l'm't's' uïr po:ipre po:spre po:simp po:3pl
SFX fY uïr uïssais/j'n'q'l'm't' uïr po:iimp po:1sg po:2sg
SFX fY uïr uïssait/n'q'l'm't's' uïr po:iimp po:3sg
SFX fY uïr uïssions/n'q'l't' uïr po:iimp po:spre po:simp po:1pl
SFX fY uïr uïssiez/n'q'l'm' uïr po:iimp po:spre po:simp po:2pl
SFX fY uïr uïssaient/n'q'l'm't's' uïr po:iimp po:3pl
SFX fY uïr uîmes/n'q'l't' uïr po:ipsi po:1pl
SFX fY uïr uîtes/n'q'l'm' uïr po:ipsi po:2pl
SFX fY uïr uïrent/n'q'l'm't's' uïr po:ipsi po:3pl!
SFX fY uïr uïrai/j'n'q'l'm't' uïr po:ifut po:1sg
SFX fY uïr uïras/n'q'l'm't' uïr po:ifut po:2sg
SFX fY uïr uïra/n'q'l'm't's' uïr po:ifut po:3sg
SFX fY uïr uïrons/n'q'l't' uïr po:ifut po:1pl
SFX fY uïr uïrez/n'q'l'm' uïr po:ifut po:2pl
SFX fY uïr uïront/n'q'l'm't's' uïr po:ifut po:3pl!
SFX fY uïr uïrais/j'n'q'l'm't' uïr po:cond po:1sg po:2sg
SFX fY uïr uïrait/n'q'l'm't's' uïr po:cond po:3sg
SFX fY uïr uïrions/n'q'l't' uïr po:cond po:1pl
SFX fY uïr uïriez/n'q'l'm' uïr po:cond po:2pl
SFX fY uïr uïraient/n'q'l'm't's' uïr po:cond po:3pl
SFX fY uïr uïsse/j'n'q'l'm't' uïr po:spre po:simp po:1sg
SFX fY uïr uïsses/n'q'l'm't' uïr po:spre po:simp po:2sg
SFX fY uïr uïsse/n'q'l'm't's' uïr po:spre po:3sg
SFX fY uïr uît/n'q'l'm't's' uïr po:simp po:3sg
SFX fY uïr uïs/n'l'm't' uïr po:impe po:2sg
SFX fY uïr uïssons/n'l't' uïr po:impe po:1pl
SFX fY uïr uïssez/n'l'm' uïr po:impe po:2pl

SFX p+ Y 8
SFX p+ er é/L'D'Q' er po:ppas po:adj po:1jsg is:mas is:sg
SFX p+ er és/D'Q' er po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:pl
SFX p+ er ée/L'D'Q' er po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:sg
SFX p+ er ées/D'Q' er po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:pl
SFX p+ ir i/L'D'Q' ir po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:sg
SFX p+ ir is/D'Q' ir po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:pl
SFX p+ ir ie/L'D'Q' ir po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:sg
SFX p+ ir ies/D'Q' ir po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:pl

SFX p. Y 2
SFX p. er é/d'q' er po:ppas po:1jsg is:epi is:inv
SFX p. ir i/d'q' ir po:ppas is:epi is:inv
